src/fst/orthography/hasselbrink2sma.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! To compile, do:

! make

! The command in the makefile is:
! hfst-xfst -F hasselbrink2sma.xfscript

! ======
! Conversion from Hasselbrink to modern orthography
! =======

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ a | á | e | ë | é | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | Ë | É | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý 
É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý ] ;

! Hasselbrink lemmata:
! a, ä, å, b, d, e, é, f, g, h, i, f, j, k, 1, m, n, ŋ, o, ö, ø, p, q, r, s, t,
! Þ, u, ü, v, y

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | ñ | ń | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | Ñ | Ń |
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž | þ   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž | Þ | ' | ´ ] ; 

define Sgm [Cns | Vow ] ;
define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;

echo << Rules >>

define onepal ´ -> ' ;
define ieuml i ë -> ï e || _ [0|Sgm+] [\i] e  ;
define ueogua ö -> e, ä -> a || u _ Cns ;
define euml ë -> e ;
define iuml ï -> i || _ e Sgm+ i e .#. ;
define shortaa a -> 0 || Syll Cns a _ Cns .#. ;
define endodh u -> o || _ d h .#. ;
define dipht o å -> å e , u o -> o e , e ä -> e a || Cns* _  ; # aa > ae ???
define diphtåa2s å e -> å a || .#. Cns* _ Cns+ [a+|o e|o|e] (l) .#. ;
define ppttkk p p -> h p, t t -> h t, k k -> h k || Vow _ Cns* (') Vow ;
define ts2hts [..] -> h  || Vow  _ t s Vow ;
define lpalh2lhk ' -> h || l _ k ;
define rk2rhk [..] -> h || Vow r _ k Vow ;
define ttj t t j -> h t j || Vow _ Vow ;
define dj d -> t || [Vow|.#.] Cns* _ j Vow ;
define mb m b -> m h p  || Vow _ Vow ;
define jg j g -> j k || Vow _ Vow ;     # g'ïjgedh=gïjkedh
define hke k k -> h k || Vow _ [' e|e] .#. ;
define voicedgeminate b b -> b p , d d -> d t, g g -> g k || Vow _ (') Cns* Vow ;  
define ht [..] -> h  || Vow [l|n|r]  _ t  (s) Vow ;
define unvoice d -> t , g -> k || .#. Syll _ (') (s) Vow  ;
define unvoiceend d -> t , g -> k, b -> p || Vow+ Cns* _ Vow+ (n) .#. ;
define diphaea ä a -> a e ;
define palatalae2ae [ ä -> æ || ' _ ];
define 1sylle ä -> e || .#. Cns* _ Cns ;
define aaumlaut2ee [ä ä -> e e || ' _ ] ;
define udots2y [' ü -> y ] ;
define udots2uumlaut ü -> u ;
define uumlaut ü -> u ;
define u2o u -> o || .#. Cns* _ v Cns* Cns* e ;
define y2u y -> u || _ v ;
define y2i y -> i || _ j ;
define frontae a -> e || a _ Cns+ [i|'] e ; ! aa → ae foran ie og ˈe
define bdgnas2ptknas b m -> p m , d n -> t n ; 
define paloeoe [ ' ö ö -> y ö ] ;
define paldel ' -> 0 || Cns _ Vow ;
define ng ŋ -> n g ;
define sj2s š -> s ;
define restae ä -> æ ;
!define prefix [..] -> # || M i e l _ ; ![ M i e l 
!                           | g l å e d t 
!			   | h u s '
!			   ] _ Cns ;
define aafin2 a -> 0 || .#. Cns* Vow+ Cns+ a _ (Cns) .#. ; 
define aafin4 a -> 0 || .#. Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ a _ (Cns) .#. ;
define aafin6 a -> 0 || .#. Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns+ a _ (xCns) .#. ;
echo << Compile... >>


read regex [ onepal
.o. ieuml
.o. ueogua
.o. euml
.o. iuml
.o. shortaa
.o. endodh
.o. dipht
.o. diphtåa2s
.o. ppttkk
.o. ts2hts
.o. lpalh2lhk
.o. rk2rhk
.o. ttj
.o. dj
.o. mb
.o. jg
.o. hke
.o. voicedgeminate
.o. ht
.o. unvoice
.o. unvoiceend
.o. diphaea
.o. palatalae2ae
.o. 1sylle
.o. aaumlaut2ee
.o. udots2y
.o. udots2uumlaut
.o. uumlaut
.o. u2o
.o. y2u
.o. y2i
.o. frontae
.o. bdgnas2ptknas
.o. paloeoe
.o. paldel
.o. ng
.o. sj2s
.o. restae
!.o. prefix
.o. aafin2
.o. aafin4
.o. aafin6
] ;

save hasselbrink2sma.hfst

echo << ... fertig >>
